Utah statutes.
7-19-4.   Rights and powers of acquired or resulting institution or holding company.

Any depository institution or depository institution holding company acquired, or the resulting institution in a merger under the provisions of this chapter, has all the rights, powers, and privileges of any other depository institution of the same class under the laws of this state, the rules of the department, the applicable laws of the United States or any other state, and the rules and regulations of the primary federal regulatory agency with jurisdiction over that institution. These rights, powers, and privileges include, but are not limited to, acquiring control of, merging with, acquiring all or a portion of the assets of, or assuming all or a portion of the liabilities of, a Utah depository institution or Utah depository institution holding company.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1986 General Session

